Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1431
Legislative action, defined.

Legislative action shall mean introduction, sponsorship, support, opposition, consideration, debate, voting, passage, defeat, approval, veto, delay, or an official action by an official in the executive branch or an official in the legislative branch on a bill, resolution, amendment, nomination, appointment, report, or any matter pending or proposed in a committee or the Legislature.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 31.